Illinois, session 104th, SB3197.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-808.1 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-808.1)7    Sec. 3-808.1. Permanent vehicle registration plate. 8    (a) Permanent vehicle registration plates shall be issued, 9at no charge, to the following:10        1. Vehicles, other than medical transport vehicles, 11    owned and operated by the State of Illinois or by any State 12    agency financed by funds appropriated by the General 13    Assembly;14        2. Special disability plates issued to vehicles owned 15    and operated by the State of Illinois or by any State 16    agency financed by funds appropriated by the General 17    Assembly.18    (b) Permanent vehicle registration plates shall be issued, 19for a one-time fee of $8.00, to the following:20        1. Vehicles, other than medical transport vehicles, 21    operated by or for any county, township or municipal 22    corporation.23        2. Vehicles owned by counties, townships or municipal   SB3197- 2 -LRB104 19066 LNS 32511 b1    corporations for persons with disabilities.2        3. Beginning with the 1991 registration year, 3    county-owned vehicles operated by or for any county 4    sheriff and designated deputy sheriffs. These registration 5    plates shall contain the specific county code and unit 6    number.7        4. All-terrain vehicles owned by counties, townships, 8    or municipal corporations and used for law enforcement 9    purposes or used as fire department vehicles when the 10    Manufacturer's Statement of Origin is accompanied with a 11    letter from the original manufacturer or a manufacturer's 12    franchised dealer stating that this all-terrain vehicle 13    has been converted to a street worthy vehicle that meets 14    the equipment requirements set forth in Chapter 12 of this 15    Code.16        5. Beginning with the 2001 registration year, 17    municipally owned vehicles operated by or for any police 18    department. These registration plates shall contain the 19    designation "municipal police" and shall be numbered and 20    distributed as prescribed by the Secretary of State.21        6. Beginning with the 2014 registration year, 22    municipally owned, fire district owned, or Mutual Aid Box 23    Alarm System (MABAS) owned vehicles operated by or for any 24    fire department, fire protection district, or MABAS. These 25    registration plates shall display the designation "Fire 26    Department" and shall display the specific fire   SB3197- 3 -LRB104 19066 LNS 32511 b1    department, fire district, fire unit, or MABAS division 2    number or letter. 3        6.5. Beginning with the 2027 registration year, 4    municipally owned, fire district owned, or Mutual Aid Box 5    Alarm System (MABAS) owned vehicles operated by volunteer 6    firefighters for any fire department, fire protection 7    district, or MABAS. These registration plates shall 8    display the designation "Volunteer Firefighter" and shall 9    display the specific fire department, fire district, fire 10    unit, or MABAS division number or letter. 11        7. Beginning with the 2017 registration year, vehicles 12    that do not require a school bus driver permit under 13    Section 6-104 to operate and are not registered under 14    Section 3-617 of this Code, and are owned by a public 15    school district from grades K-12 or a public community 16    college. 17        8. Beginning with the 2017 registration year, vehicles 18    of the first division or vehicles of the second division 19    weighing not more than 8,000 pounds that are owned by a 20    medical facility or hospital of a municipality, county, or 21    township. 22        9. Beginning with the 2020 registration year, 2-axle 23    motor vehicles that (i) are designed and used as buses in a 24    public system for transporting more than 10 passengers; 25    (ii) are used as common carriers in the general 26    transportation of passengers and not devoted to any   SB3197- 4 -LRB104 19066 LNS 32511 b1    specialized purpose; (iii) operate entirely within the 2    territorial limits of a single municipality or a single 3    municipality and contiguous municipalities; and (iv) are 4    subject to the regulation of the Illinois Commerce 5    Commission. The owner of a vehicle under this paragraph is 6    exempt from paying a flat weight tax or a mileage weight 7    tax under this Code. 8        10. Beginning with the 2027 registration year, 9    vehicles owned by a municipality or fire protection 10    district operated by or for the emergency medical services 11    (EMS) chief that are eligible for issuance of EMS chief 12    license plates under Section 3-699.26. 13    (b-5) Beginning with the 2016 registration year, permanent 14vehicle registration plates shall be issued for a one-time fee 15of $8.00 to a county, township, or municipal corporation that 16owns or operates vehicles used for the purpose of community 17workplace commuting as defined by the Secretary of State by 18administrative rule. The design and color of the plates shall 19be wholly within the discretion of the Secretary. The 20Secretary of State may adopt rules to implement this 21subsection (b-5). 22    (c) Beginning with the 2012 registration year, 23county-owned vehicles operated by or for any county sheriff 24and designated deputy sheriffs that have been issued 25registration plates under subsection (b) of this Section shall 26be exempt from any fee for the transfer of registration from   SB3197- 5 -LRB104 19066 LNS 32511 b1one vehicle to another vehicle. Each county sheriff shall 2report to the Secretary of State any transfer of registration 3plates from one vehicle to another vehicle operated by or for 4any county sheriff and designated deputy sheriffs. The 5Secretary of State shall adopt rules to implement this 6subsection (c).7    (c-5) Beginning with the 2014 registration year, 8municipally owned, fire district owned, or Mutual Aid Box 9Alarm System (MABAS) owned vehicles operated by or for any 10fire department, fire protection district, or MABAS that have 11been issued registration plates under subsection (b) of this 12Section shall be exempt from any fee for the transfer of 13registration from one vehicle to another vehicle. Each fire 14department, fire protection district, of MABAS shall report to 15the Secretary of State any transfer of registration plates 16from one vehicle to another vehicle operated by or for any fire 17department, fire protection district, or MABAS. The Secretary 18of State shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. 19    (d) Beginning with the 2013 registration year, municipally 20owned vehicles operated by or for any police department that 21have been issued registration plates under subsection (b) of 22this Section shall be exempt from any fee for the transfer of 23registration from one vehicle to another vehicle. Each 24municipal police department shall report to the Secretary of 25State any transfer of registration plates from one vehicle to 26another vehicle operated by or for any municipal police   SB3197- 6 -LRB104 19066 LNS 32511 b1department. The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to 2implement this subsection (d). 3    (e) Beginning with the 2016 registration year, any vehicle 4owned or operated by a county, township, or municipal 5corporation that has been issued registration plates under 6this Section is exempt from any fee for the transfer of 7registration from one vehicle to another vehicle. Each county, 8township, or municipal corporation shall report to the 9Secretary of State any transfer of registration plates from 10one vehicle to another vehicle operated by or for any county, 11township, or municipal corporation. 12    (f) Beginning with the 2020 registration year, any vehicle 13owned or operated by a public school district from grades 14K-12, a public community college, or a medical facility or 15hospital of a municipality, county, or township that has been 16issued registration plates under this Section is exempt from 17any fee for the transfer of registration from one vehicle to 18another vehicle. Each school district, public community 19college, or medical facility or hospital shall report to the 20Secretary any transfer of registration plates from one vehicle 21to another vehicle operated by the school district, public 22community college, or medical facility. 23    (g) Beginning with the 2025 registration year, vehicles 24owned or operated by or for a private or public university 25police department or a private or public college police 26department, except for motor driven cycles and all-terrain   SB3197- 7 -LRB104 19066 LNS 32511 b1vehicles, may be registered under subsection (b) of this 2Section. These registration plates shall contain the 3designation "university police" or "college police" and shall 4be numbered and distributed as prescribed by the Secretary of 5State. 6(Source: P.A. 103-135, eff. 1-1-24; 104-213, eff. 1-1-26; 7104-304, eff. 8-15-25; revised 11-21-25.)